Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2110
Plan; recommendation; requirement.

An authority shall not recommend a redevelopment plan to the governing body of the city in which the redevelopment project area is located until a general plan for the development of the city has been prepared.

Laws 1951, c. 224, § 6(3), p. 805;

R.R.S.1943, § 14-1610;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2610.